Illinois, session 104th, HB4000.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.5 as follows:  6    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)7    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 8by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 9exempt from inspection and copying:10        (a) All information determined to be confidential 11    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 12    Development Act.13        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 14    library users with specific materials under the Library 15    Records Confidentiality Act.16        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 17    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 18    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 19    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 20    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 21    has received.22        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 23    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating   HB4000- 2 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 2    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 3    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 4    Infection Control Act.5        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 6    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.7        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 8    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 9    Qualifications Based Selection Act.10        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 12    Tuition Act.13        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 14    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 15    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 16    general's office that would be exempt if created or 17    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 18    that Act.19        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 20    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 21    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 22    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.23        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 24    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 25    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.26        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information   HB4000- 3 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    or driver identification information compiled by a law 2    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 3    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.4        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 5    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 6    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 7    Prevention Review Team Act.8        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 9    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 10    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 11    authorized under that Article.12        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 13    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 14    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 15    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 16    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 17    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 18    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.19        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 20    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 21    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.22        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 23    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 24    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 25    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 26    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the   HB4000- 4 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 2    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 3    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 4    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 5    Act (repealed). 6        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 7    Personnel Record Review Act. 8        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 9    Illinois School Student Records Act. 10        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 11    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 12        (t) (Blank). 13        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 14    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 15    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 16        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 17    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 18    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 19    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 20    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 21    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 22    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 23    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 24    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 25    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 26        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification   HB4000- 5 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 2    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.3        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 4    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 5    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.6        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 7    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 8    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 9        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 10    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 11    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 12    information about the identity and administrative finding 13    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 14    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 15    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 16    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 17        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 18    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 19    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 20    Act. 21        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 23        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 24    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 25        (cc) Recordings or portions of recordings made under 26    the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except   HB4000- 6 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    to the extent authorized under that Act.2        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 3    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 4    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 5        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 6    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 7        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 8    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 9        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 11    Code. 12        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 13    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 14        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 15    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 16    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 18    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 19    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 20    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 21    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 22        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 23    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 24        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 25    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 26    Aid Code.   HB4000- 7 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 2    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 3        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 5        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 6    arising out of a peer support counseling session 7    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 8    Suicide Prevention Act. 9        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 10    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 11    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 12    Prevention Act. 13        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 14    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 15    under the Reproductive Health Act. 16        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 18        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 19    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 20    Human Rights Act.21        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 22    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 23    Act. 24        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 25    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 26        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under   HB4000- 8 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 2    Public Aid Code. 3        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 5        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 6    information that shall not be made public under the 7    Illinois Insurance Code. 8        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 9    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.10        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 11    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 12        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 14        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 15    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 16    Police Act. 17        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 18    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 19    Administrative Code of Illinois. 20        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 21    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 22    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 23    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 24        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 25    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 26    Violence Fatality Review Act.   HB4000- 9 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 2    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 3    July 1, 2025. 4        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 5    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 6    Agency Licensing Act. 7        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 8    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 9    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 10    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 11    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 12    Act. 13        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 14    the School Safety Drill Act. 15        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 16    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 17        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 18    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 19    Act. 20        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 21    2-3.196 of the School Code. 22        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 23    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 24    Power Agency Act. 25        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 26    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the   HB4000- 10 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 2        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 3    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 4    Act. 5        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 6    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 7    Act. 8        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 9    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 10        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 11    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 12    Transmission Modernization Act. 13        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.15(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 16102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 178-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 18102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 196-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 20eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 21103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 227-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 23eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 24103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 25    Section 10. The Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera   HB4000- 11 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1Act is amended by changing Sections 10-10, 10-15, and 10-20 as 2follows: 3    (50 ILCS 706/10-10)4    Sec. 10-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:5    "Badge" means an officer's department issued 6identification number associated with his or her position as a 7police officer with that department.8    "Board" means the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 9Standards Board created by the Illinois Police Training Act.10    "Business offense" means a petty offense for which the 11fine is in excess of $1,000.12    "Community caretaking function" means a task undertaken by 13a law enforcement officer in which the officer is performing 14an articulable act unrelated to the investigation of a crime. 15"Community caretaking function" includes, but is not limited 16to, participating in town halls or other community outreach, 17helping a child find his or her parents, providing death 18notifications, and performing in-home or hospital well-being 19checks on the sick, elderly, or persons presumed missing. 20"Community caretaking function" excludes law 21enforcement-related encounters or activities. 22    "Fund" means the Law Enforcement Camera Grant Fund. 23    "In uniform" means a law enforcement officer who is 24wearing any officially authorized uniform designated by a law 25enforcement agency, or a law enforcement officer who is   HB4000- 12 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1visibly wearing articles of clothing, a badge, tactical gear, 2gun belt, a patch, or other insignia that he or she is a law 3enforcement officer acting in the course of his or her duties. 4A law enforcement officer is "in uniform" only when primarily 5assigned to respond to law enforcement-related encounters or 6activities and is not "in uniform" when primarily assigned to 7other law enforcement duties that are not law 8enforcement-related encounters or activities. 9    "Law enforcement officer" or "officer" means any person 10employed by a State, county, municipality, special district, 11college, unit of government, or any other entity authorized by 12law to employ peace officers or exercise police authority and 13who is primarily responsible for the prevention or detection 14of crime and the enforcement of the laws of this State.15    "Law enforcement agency" means all State agencies with law 16enforcement officers, county sheriff's offices, municipal, 17special district, college, or unit of local government police 18departments.19    "Law enforcement-related encounters or activities" 20include, but are not limited to, traffic stops, pedestrian 21stops, arrests, searches, interrogations, investigations, 22pursuits, crowd control, traffic control, non-community 23caretaking interactions with an individual while on patrol, or 24any other instance in which the officer is enforcing the laws 25of the municipality, county, or State. "Law 26enforcement-related encounter or activities" does not include   HB4000- 13 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1when the officer is completing paperwork alone, is 2participating in training in a classroom setting, or is only 3in the presence of another law enforcement officer.4    "Minor traffic offense" means a petty offense, business 5offense, or Class C misdemeanor under the Illinois Vehicle 6Code or a similar provision of a municipal or local ordinance.7    "No expectation of privacy" means when a person is in a 8publicly accessible area or when a person is engaging with law 9enforcement officers during the scope of an officer's official 10duties, even when the engagement is in a private residence 11when officers are lawfully present in the residence during the 12course of official duties. 13    "Officer-worn body camera" means an electronic camera 14system for creating, generating, sending, receiving, storing, 15displaying, and processing audiovisual recordings that may be 16worn about the person of a law enforcement officer.17    "Peace officer" has the meaning provided in Section 2-13 18of the Criminal Code of 2012.19    "Petty offense" means any offense for which a sentence of 20imprisonment is not an authorized disposition.21    "Recording" means the process of capturing data or 22information stored on a recording medium as required under 23this Act. 24    "Recording medium" means any recording medium authorized 25by the Board for the retention and playback of recorded audio 26and video including, but not limited to, VHS, DVD, hard drive,   HB4000- 14 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1cloud storage, solid state, digital, flash memory technology, 2or any other electronic medium.3(Source: P.A. 102-1104, eff. 12-6-22.) 4    (50 ILCS 706/10-15)5    Sec. 10-15. Applicability. 6    (a) All law enforcement agencies must employ the use of 7officer-worn body cameras in accordance with the provisions of 8this Act, whether or not the agency receives or has received 9monies from the Law Enforcement Camera Grant Fund. 10    (b) Except as provided in subsection (b-5), all law 11enforcement agencies must implement the use of body cameras 12for all law enforcement officers, according to the following 13schedule:14        (1) for municipalities and counties with populations 15    of 500,000 or more, body cameras shall be implemented by 16    January 1, 2022;17        (2) for municipalities and counties with populations 18    of 100,000 or more but under 500,000, body cameras shall 19    be implemented by January 1, 2023;20        (3) for municipalities and counties with populations 21    of 50,000 or more but under 100,000, body cameras shall be 22    implemented by January 1, 2024;23        (4) for municipalities and counties under 50,000, body 24    cameras shall be implemented by January 1, 2025; and25        (5) for all State agencies with law enforcement   HB4000- 15 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    officers and other remaining law enforcement agencies, 2    body cameras shall be implemented by January 1, 2025. 3    (b-5) If a law enforcement agency that serves a 4municipality with a population of at least 100,000 but not 5more than 500,000 or a law enforcement agency that serves a 6county with a population of at least 100,000 but not more than 7500,000 has ordered by October 1, 2022 or purchased by that 8date officer-worn body cameras for use by the law enforcement 9agency, then the law enforcement agency may implement the use 10of body cameras for all of its law enforcement officers by no 11later than July 1, 2023. Records of purchase within this 12timeline shall be submitted to the Illinois Law Enforcement 13Training Standards Board by January 1, 2023. 14    (c) A law enforcement agency's compliance with the 15requirements under this Section shall receive preference by 16the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board in 17awarding grant funding under the Law Enforcement Camera Grant 18Act. 19    (d) This Section does not apply to court security 20officers, school resource officers, undercover or covert 21officers, officers that are employed in an administrative 22capacity, State's Attorney investigators, and Attorney General 23investigators. However, this Section applies to undercover or 24covert officers when conducting interviews. 25(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 26102-1104, eff. 12-6-22.)   HB4000- 16 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    (50 ILCS 706/10-20)2    Sec. 10-20. Requirements. 3    (a) The Board shall develop basic guidelines for the use 4of officer-worn body cameras by law enforcement agencies. The 5guidelines developed by the Board shall be the basis for the 6written policy which must be adopted by each law enforcement 7agency which employs the use of officer-worn body cameras. The 8written policy adopted by the law enforcement agency must 9include, at a minimum, all of the following:10        (1) Cameras must be equipped with pre-event recording, 11    capable of recording at least the 30 seconds prior to 12    camera activation, unless the officer-worn body camera was 13    purchased and acquired by the law enforcement agency prior 14    to July 1, 2015.15        (2) Cameras must be capable of recording for a period 16    of 10 hours or more, unless the officer-worn body camera 17    was purchased and acquired by the law enforcement agency 18    prior to July 1, 2015.19        (3) Cameras must be turned on at all times when the 20    officer is in uniform and is responding to calls for 21    service or engaged in any law enforcement-related 22    encounter or activity that occurs while the officer is on 23    duty.24            (A) If exigent circumstances exist which prevent 25        the camera from being turned on, the camera must be   HB4000- 17 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        turned on as soon as practicable.2            (B) Officer-worn body cameras may be turned off 3        when the officer is inside of a patrol car which is 4        equipped with a functioning in-car camera; however, 5        the officer must turn on the camera upon exiting the 6        patrol vehicle for law enforcement-related encounters.7            (C) Officer-worn body cameras may be turned off 8        when the officer is inside a correctional facility or 9        courthouse which is equipped with a functioning camera 10        system. 11        (4) Cameras must be turned off when: 12            (A) the victim of a crime requests that the camera 13        be turned off, and unless impractical or impossible, 14        that request is made on the recording;15            (B) a witness of a crime or a community member who 16        wishes to report a crime requests that the camera be 17        turned off, and unless impractical or impossible that 18        request is made on the recording; 19            (C) the officer is interacting with a confidential 20        informant used by the law enforcement agency; or21            (D) an officer of the Department of Revenue enters 22        a Department of Revenue facility or conducts an 23        interview during which return information will be 24        discussed or visible. 25        However, an officer may continue to record or resume 26    recording a victim or a witness, if exigent circumstances   HB4000- 18 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    exist, or if the officer has reasonable articulable 2    suspicion that a victim or witness, or confidential 3    informant has committed or is in the process of committing 4    a crime. Under these circumstances, and unless impractical 5    or impossible, the officer must indicate on the recording 6    the reason for continuing to record despite the request of 7    the victim or witness.8        (4.5) Cameras may be turned off when the officer is 9    engaged in community caretaking functions. However, the 10    camera must be turned on when the officer has reason to 11    believe that the person on whose behalf the officer is 12    performing a community caretaking function has committed 13    or is in the process of committing a crime. If exigent 14    circumstances exist which prevent the camera from being 15    turned on, the camera must be turned on as soon as 16    practicable.17        (5) Before January 1, 2027, an The officer must 18    provide notice of recording to any person if the person 19    has a reasonable expectation of privacy. Proof and proof 20    of notice must be evident in the recording. If exigent 21    circumstances exist which prevent the officer from 22    providing notice, notice must be provided as soon as 23    practicable. 24        (6) (A) For the purposes of redaction or duplicating 25    recordings, access to camera recordings shall be 26    restricted to only those personnel responsible for those   HB4000- 19 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    purposes. The recording officer or his or her supervisor 2    may not redact, duplicate, or otherwise alter the 3    recording officer's camera recordings. Except as otherwise 4    provided in this Section, the recording officer and his or 5    her supervisor may access and review recordings prior to 6    completing incident reports or other documentation, 7    provided that the supervisor discloses that fact in the 8    report or documentation.9            (i) A law enforcement officer shall not have 10        access to or review his or her body-worn camera 11        recordings or the body-worn camera recordings of 12        another officer prior to completing incident reports 13        or other documentation when the officer: 14                (a) has been involved in or is a witness to an 15            officer-involved shooting, use of deadly force 16            incident, or use of force incidents resulting in 17            great bodily harm;18                (b) is ordered to write a report in response 19            to or during the investigation of a misconduct 20            complaint against the officer.21            (ii) If the officer subject to subparagraph (i) 22        prepares a report, any report shall be prepared 23        without viewing body-worn camera recordings, and 24        subject to supervisor's approval, officers may file 25        amendatory reports after viewing body-worn camera 26        recordings. Supplemental reports under this provision   HB4000- 20 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        shall also contain documentation regarding access to 2        the video footage. 3            (B) The recording officer's assigned field 4        training officer may access and review recordings for 5        training purposes. Any detective or investigator 6        directly involved in the investigation of a matter may 7        access and review recordings which pertain to that 8        investigation but may not have access to delete or 9        alter such recordings. 10        (7) Recordings made on officer-worn cameras must be 11    retained by the law enforcement agency or by the camera 12    vendor used by the agency, on a recording medium for a 13    period of 90 days.14            (A) Under no circumstances shall any recording, 15        except for a non-law enforcement related activity or 16        encounter, made with an officer-worn body camera be 17        altered, erased, or destroyed prior to the expiration 18        of the 90-day storage period. In the event any 19        recording made with an officer-worn body camera is 20        altered, erased, or destroyed prior to the expiration 21        of the 90-day storage period, the law enforcement 22        agency shall maintain, for a period of one year, a 23        written record including (i) the name of the 24        individual who made such alteration, erasure, or 25        destruction, and (ii) the reason for any such 26        alteration, erasure, or destruction.   HB4000- 21 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1            (B) Following the 90-day storage period, any and 2        all recordings made with an officer-worn body camera 3        must be destroyed, unless any encounter captured on 4        the recording has been flagged. An encounter is deemed 5        to be flagged when: 6                (i) a formal investigation or informal 7            inquiry, as those terms are defined in Section 2 8            of the Uniform Peace Officers' Disciplinary Act, 9            has commenced complaint has been filed;10                (ii) the officer discharged his or her firearm 11            or used force during the encounter; 12                (iii) death or great bodily harm occurred to 13            any person in the recording; 14                (iv) the encounter resulted in a detention or 15            an arrest, excluding traffic stops which resulted 16            in only a minor traffic offense or business 17            offense;18                (v) the officer is the subject of an internal 19            investigation or otherwise being investigated for 20            possible misconduct; 21                (vi) the supervisor of the officer, 22            prosecutor, defendant, or court determines that 23            the encounter has evidentiary value in a criminal 24            prosecution; or25                (vii) the recording officer requests that the 26            video be flagged for official purposes related to   HB4000- 22 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1            his or her official duties or believes it may have 2            evidentiary value in a criminal prosecution.3            (C) Under no circumstances shall any recording 4        made with an officer-worn body camera relating to a 5        flagged encounter be altered or destroyed prior to 2 6        years after the recording was flagged. If the flagged 7        recording was used in a criminal, civil, or 8        administrative proceeding, the recording shall not be 9        destroyed except upon a final disposition and order 10        from the court.11            (D) Nothing in this Act prohibits law enforcement 12        agencies from labeling officer-worn body camera video 13        within the recording medium; provided that the 14        labeling does not alter the actual recording of the 15        incident captured on the officer-worn body camera. The 16        labels, titles, and tags shall not be construed as 17        altering the officer-worn body camera video in any 18        way. 19        (8) Following the 90-day storage period, recordings 20    may be retained if a supervisor at the law enforcement 21    agency designates the recording for training purposes. If 22    the recording is designated for training purposes, the 23    recordings may be viewed by officers, in the presence of a 24    supervisor or training instructor, for the purposes of 25    instruction, training, or ensuring compliance with agency 26    policies.   HB4000- 23 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        (9) Recordings shall not be used to discipline law 2    enforcement officers unless:3            (A) a formal investigation or informal inquiry, as 4        those terms are defined in Section 2 of the Uniform 5        Peace Officers' Disciplinary Act, has commenced a 6        formal or informal complaint of misconduct has been 7        made;8            (B) a use of force incident has occurred;9            (C) the encounter on the recording could result in 10        a formal investigation under the Uniform Peace 11        Officers' Disciplinary Act; or12            (D) as corroboration of other evidence of 13        misconduct.14        Nothing in this paragraph (9) shall be construed to 15    limit or prohibit a law enforcement officer from being 16    subject to an action that does not amount to discipline.17        (10) The law enforcement agency shall ensure proper 18    care and maintenance of officer-worn body cameras. Upon 19    becoming aware, officers must as soon as practical 20    document and notify the appropriate supervisor of any 21    technical difficulties, failures, or problems with the 22    officer-worn body camera or associated equipment. Upon 23    receiving notice, the appropriate supervisor shall make 24    every reasonable effort to correct and repair any of the 25    officer-worn body camera equipment.26        (11) No officer may hinder or prohibit any person, not   HB4000- 24 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    a law enforcement officer, from recording a law 2    enforcement officer in the performance of his or her 3    duties in a public place or when the officer has no 4    reasonable expectation of privacy. The law enforcement 5    agency's written policy shall indicate the potential 6    criminal penalties, as well as any departmental 7    discipline, which may result from unlawful confiscation or 8    destruction of the recording medium of a person who is not 9    a law enforcement officer. However, an officer may take 10    reasonable action to maintain safety and control, secure 11    crime scenes and accident sites, protect the integrity and 12    confidentiality of investigations, and protect the public 13    safety and order.14    (b) Recordings made with the use of an officer-worn body 15camera are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of 16Information Act, except when a recording is flagged due to the 17filing of a complaint, discharge of a firearm, use of force, 18arrest or detention, or resulting death or bodily harm, and 19the subject of the encounter has a reasonable expectation of 20privacy at the time of the recording. A recording subject to 21disclosure under this subsection may be only released to the 22subject of the encounter captured on the recording or the 23subject's legal representative if the law enforcement agency 24obtains written permission of the subject or the subject's 25legal representative. Any disclosure under this subsection (b) 26shall be limited to the portion of the recording containing   HB4000- 25 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1the subject of the encounter captured by the primary officer's 2body-worn camera. that:3        (1) if the subject of the encounter has a reasonable 4    expectation of privacy, at the time of the recording, any 5    recording which is flagged, due to the filing of a 6    complaint, discharge of a firearm, use of force, arrest or 7    detention, or resulting death or bodily harm, shall be 8    disclosed in accordance with the Freedom of Information 9    Act if:10            (A) the subject of the encounter captured on the 11        recording is a victim or witness; and12            (B) the law enforcement agency obtains written 13        permission of the subject or the subject's legal 14        representative;15        (2) except as provided in paragraph (1) of this 16    subsection (b), any recording which is flagged due to the 17    filing of a complaint, discharge of a firearm, use of 18    force, arrest or detention, or resulting death or bodily 19    harm shall be disclosed in accordance with the Freedom of 20    Information Act; and21        (3) upon request, the law enforcement agency shall 22    disclose, in accordance with the Freedom of Information 23    Act, the recording to the subject of the encounter 24    captured on the recording or to the subject's attorney, or 25    the officer or his or her legal representative.26    For the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection (b),   HB4000- 26 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1no person shall the subject of the encounter does not have a 2reasonable expectation of privacy if the person the subject 3was arrested as a result of the encounter or if the encounter 4was captured in a publicly accessible area. For purposes of 5subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection (b), 6"witness" does not include a person who is a victim or who was 7arrested as a result of the encounter. 8    Only recordings or portions of recordings responsive to 9the request shall be available for inspection or reproduction. 10Any recording disclosed under the Freedom of Information Act 11shall be redacted to remove identification of any person that 12appears on the recording and is not the officer, a subject of 13the encounter, or directly involved in the encounter if they 14are readily identifiable and have an expectation of privacy. 15Nothing in this subsection (b) shall require the disclosure of 16any recording or portion of any recording which would be 17exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act.18    (c) Nothing in this Section shall limit access to an 19officer-worn body a camera recording for the purposes of 20complying with Supreme Court rules or the rules of evidence.21(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 22102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1104, eff. 2312-6-22.) 24    Section 15. The Law Enforcement Camera Grant Act is 25amended by changing Sections 15 and 20 as follows:   HB4000- 27 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    (50 ILCS 707/15)2    Sec. 15. Rules; in-car video camera grants.3    (a) The Board shall develop model rules for the use of 4in-car video cameras to be adopted by law enforcement agencies 5that receive grants under Section 10 of this Act. The rules 6shall include all of the following requirements:7        (1) Cameras must be installed in the law enforcement 8    agency vehicles.9        (2) Video recording must provide audio of the officer 10    when the officer is outside of the vehicle.11        (3) Camera access must be restricted to the 12    supervisors of the officer in the vehicle.13        (4) Cameras must be turned on continuously throughout 14    the officer's shift.15        (5) A copy of the video record must be made available 16    upon request to personnel of the law enforcement agency, 17    the local State's Attorney, and any persons depicted in 18    the video. Procedures for distribution of the video record 19    must include safeguards to protect the identities of 20    individuals who are not a party to the requested stop.21        (6) Law enforcement agencies that receive moneys under 22    this grant shall provide for storage of the video records 23    for a period of not less than 2 years.24    (b) Each law enforcement agency receiving a grant for 25in-car video cameras under Section 10 of this Act must provide   HB4000- 28 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1an annual report to the Board, the Governor, and the General 2Assembly on or before May 1 of the year following the receipt 3of the grant and by each May 1 thereafter during the period of 4the grant. The report shall include the following:5        (1) the number of cameras received by the law 6    enforcement agency;7        (2) the number of cameras actually installed in law 8    enforcement agency vehicles;9        (3) a brief description of the review process used by 10    supervisors within the law enforcement agency;11        (4) (blank); and a list of any criminal, traffic, 12    ordinance, and civil cases in which in-car video 13    recordings were used, including party names, case numbers, 14    offenses charged, and disposition of the matter. 15    Proceedings to which this paragraph (4) applies include, 16    but are not limited to, court proceedings, coroner's 17    inquests, grand jury proceedings, and plea bargains; and18        (5) any other information relevant to the 19    administration of the program.20(Source: P.A. 99-352, eff. 1-1-16.) 21    (50 ILCS 707/20)22    Sec. 20. Rules; officer body-worn camera grants.23    (a) The Board shall develop model rules for the use of 24officer body-worn cameras to be adopted by law enforcement 25agencies that receive grants under Section 10 of this Act. The   HB4000- 29 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1rules shall comply with the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body 2Camera Act.3    (b) Each law enforcement agency receiving a grant for 4officer-worn body cameras under Section 10 of this Act must 5provide an annual report to the Board, the Governor, and the 6General Assembly on or before May 1 of the year following the 7receipt of the grant and by each May 1 thereafter during the 8period of the grant. The report shall include:9        (1) a brief overview of the makeup of the agency, 10    including the number of officers utilizing officer-worn 11    body cameras;12        (2) the number of officer-worn body cameras utilized 13    by the law enforcement agency;14        (3) any technical issues with the equipment and how 15    those issues were remedied;16        (4) a brief description of the review process used by 17    supervisors within the law enforcement agency;18        (5) (blank); for each recording used in prosecutions 19    of conservation, criminal, or traffic offenses or 20    municipal ordinance violations:21            (A) the time, date, and location of the incident; 22        and23            (B) the offenses charged and the date charges were 24        filed;25        (6) (blank); and for a recording used in a civil 26    proceeding or internal affairs investigation:  HB4000- 30 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1            (A) the number of pending civil proceedings and 2        internal investigations;3            (B) in resolved civil proceedings and pending 4        investigations:5                (i) the nature of the complaint or 6            allegations;7                (ii) the disposition, if known; and8                (iii) the date, time and location of the 9            incident; and10        (7) any other information relevant to the 11    administration of the program.12    (c) On or before July 30 of each year, the Board must 13analyze the law enforcement agency reports and provide an 14annual report to the General Assembly and the Governor.15(Source: P.A. 99-352, eff. 1-1-16.) 16    Section 20. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 17changing Sections 14-3 and 31-4 as follows: 18    (720 ILCS 5/14-3)19    Sec. 14-3. Exemptions. The following activities shall be 20exempt from the provisions of this Article:21        (a) Listening to radio, wireless electronic 22    communications, and television communications of any sort 23    where the same are publicly made;24        (b) Hearing conversation when heard by employees of   HB4000- 31 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    any common carrier by wire incidental to the normal course 2    of their employment in the operation, maintenance or 3    repair of the equipment of such common carrier by wire so 4    long as no information obtained thereby is used or 5    divulged by the hearer;6        (c) Any broadcast by radio, television or otherwise 7    whether it be a broadcast or recorded for the purpose of 8    later broadcasts of any function where the public is in 9    attendance and the conversations are overheard incidental 10    to the main purpose for which such broadcasts are then 11    being made;12        (d) Recording or listening with the aid of any device 13    to any emergency communication made in the normal course 14    of operations by any federal, state or local law 15    enforcement agency or institutions dealing in emergency 16    services, including, but not limited to, hospitals, 17    clinics, ambulance services, fire fighting agencies, any 18    public utility, emergency repair facility, civilian 19    defense establishment or military installation;20        (e) Recording the proceedings of any meeting required 21    to be open by the Open Meetings Act, as amended;22        (f) Recording or listening with the aid of any device 23    to incoming telephone calls of phone lines publicly listed 24    or advertised as consumer "hotlines" by manufacturers or 25    retailers of food and drug products. Such recordings must 26    be destroyed, erased or turned over to local law   HB4000- 32 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    enforcement authorities within 24 hours from the time of 2    such recording and shall not be otherwise disseminated. 3    Failure on the part of the individual or business 4    operating any such recording or listening device to comply 5    with the requirements of this subsection shall eliminate 6    any civil or criminal immunity conferred upon that 7    individual or business by the operation of this Section;8        (g) With prior notification to the State's Attorney of 9    the county in which it is to occur, recording or listening 10    with the aid of any device to any conversation where a law 11    enforcement officer, or any person acting at the direction 12    of law enforcement, is a party to the conversation and has 13    consented to it being intercepted or recorded under 14    circumstances where the use of the device is necessary for 15    the protection of the law enforcement officer or any 16    person acting at the direction of law enforcement, in the 17    course of an investigation of a forcible felony, a felony 18    offense of involuntary servitude, involuntary sexual 19    servitude of a minor, or trafficking in persons under 20    Section 10-9 of this Code, an offense involving 21    prostitution, solicitation of a sexual act, or pandering, 22    a felony violation of the Illinois Controlled Substances 23    Act, a felony violation of the Cannabis Control Act, a 24    felony violation of the Methamphetamine Control and 25    Community Protection Act, any "streetgang related" or 26    "gang-related" felony as those terms are defined in the   HB4000- 33 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act, or 2    any felony offense involving any weapon listed in 3    paragraphs (1) through (11) of subsection (a) of Section 4    24-1 of this Code. Any recording or evidence derived as 5    the result of this exemption shall be inadmissible in any 6    proceeding, criminal, civil or administrative, except (i) 7    where a party to the conversation suffers great bodily 8    injury or is killed during such conversation, or (ii) when 9    used as direct impeachment of a witness concerning matters 10    contained in the interception or recording. The Director 11    of the Illinois State Police shall issue regulations as 12    are necessary concerning the use of devices, retention of 13    tape recordings, and reports regarding their use;14        (g-5) (Blank);15        (g-6) With approval of the State's Attorney of the 16    county in which it is to occur, recording or listening 17    with the aid of any device to any conversation where a law 18    enforcement officer, or any person acting at the direction 19    of law enforcement, is a party to the conversation and has 20    consented to it being intercepted or recorded in the 21    course of an investigation of child pornography, 22    aggravated child pornography, indecent solicitation of a 23    child, luring of a minor, sexual exploitation of a child, 24    aggravated criminal sexual abuse in which the victim of 25    the offense was at the time of the commission of the 26    offense under 18 years of age, or criminal sexual abuse by   HB4000- 34 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    force or threat of force in which the victim of the offense 2    was at the time of the commission of the offense under 18 3    years of age. In all such cases, an application for an 4    order approving the previous or continuing use of an 5    eavesdropping device must be made within 48 hours of the 6    commencement of such use. In the absence of such an order, 7    or upon its denial, any continuing use shall immediately 8    terminate. The Director of the Illinois State Police shall 9    issue rules as are necessary concerning the use of 10    devices, retention of recordings, and reports regarding 11    their use. Any recording or evidence obtained or derived 12    in the course of an investigation of child pornography, 13    aggravated child pornography, indecent solicitation of a 14    child, luring of a minor, sexual exploitation of a child, 15    aggravated criminal sexual abuse in which the victim of 16    the offense was at the time of the commission of the 17    offense under 18 years of age, or criminal sexual abuse by 18    force or threat of force in which the victim of the offense 19    was at the time of the commission of the offense under 18 20    years of age shall, upon motion of the State's Attorney or 21    Attorney General prosecuting any case involving child 22    pornography, aggravated child pornography, indecent 23    solicitation of a child, luring of a minor, sexual 24    exploitation of a child, aggravated criminal sexual abuse 25    in which the victim of the offense was at the time of the 26    commission of the offense under 18 years of age, or   HB4000- 35 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    criminal sexual abuse by force or threat of force in which 2    the victim of the offense was at the time of the commission 3    of the offense under 18 years of age be reviewed in camera 4    with notice to all parties present by the court presiding 5    over the criminal case, and, if ruled by the court to be 6    relevant and otherwise admissible, it shall be admissible 7    at the trial of the criminal case. Absent such a ruling, 8    any such recording or evidence shall not be admissible at 9    the trial of the criminal case;10        (h) Recordings made simultaneously with the use of an 11    in-car video camera recording of an oral conversation 12    between a uniformed peace officer, who has identified his 13    or her office, and a person in the presence of the peace 14    officer whenever (i) an officer assigned a patrol vehicle 15    is conducting an enforcement stop; or (ii) patrol vehicle 16    emergency lights are activated or would otherwise be 17    activated if not for the need to conceal the presence of 18    law enforcement.19        For the purposes of this subsection (h), "enforcement 20    stop" means an action by a law enforcement officer in 21    relation to enforcement and investigation duties, 22    including but not limited to, traffic stops, pedestrian 23    stops, abandoned vehicle contacts, motorist assists, 24    commercial motor vehicle stops, roadside safety checks, 25    requests for identification, or responses to requests for 26    emergency assistance;  HB4000- 36 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        (h-5) Recordings of utterances made by a person while 2    in the presence of a uniformed peace officer and while an 3    occupant of a police vehicle including, but not limited 4    to, (i) recordings made simultaneously with the use of an 5    in-car video camera and (ii) recordings made in the 6    presence of the peace officer utilizing video or audio 7    systems, or both, authorized by the law enforcement 8    agency;9        (h-10) Recordings made simultaneously with a video 10    camera recording during the use of a taser or similar 11    weapon or device by a peace officer if the weapon or device 12    is equipped with such camera;13        (h-15) Recordings made under subsection (h), (h-5), or 14    (h-10) shall be retained by the law enforcement agency 15    that employs the peace officer who made the recordings for 16    a storage period of 90 days, unless the recordings are 17    made as a part of an arrest or the recordings are deemed 18    evidence in any criminal, civil, or administrative 19    proceeding and then the recordings must only be destroyed 20    upon a final disposition and an order from the court. 21    Under no circumstances shall any recording be altered or 22    erased prior to the expiration of the designated storage 23    period. Upon completion of the storage period, the 24    recording medium may be erased and reissued for 25    operational use;26        (i) Recording of a conversation made by or at the   HB4000- 37 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    request of a person, not a law enforcement officer or 2    agent of a law enforcement officer, who is a party to the 3    conversation, under reasonable suspicion that another 4    party to the conversation is committing, is about to 5    commit, or has committed a criminal offense against the 6    person or a member of his or her immediate household, and 7    there is reason to believe that evidence of the criminal 8    offense may be obtained by the recording;9        (j) The use of a telephone monitoring device by either 10    (1) a corporation or other business entity engaged in 11    marketing or opinion research or (2) a corporation or 12    other business entity engaged in telephone solicitation, 13    as defined in this subsection, to record or listen to oral 14    telephone solicitation conversations or marketing or 15    opinion research conversations by an employee of the 16    corporation or other business entity when:17            (i) the monitoring is used for the purpose of 18        service quality control of marketing or opinion 19        research or telephone solicitation, the education or 20        training of employees or contractors engaged in 21        marketing or opinion research or telephone 22        solicitation, or internal research related to 23        marketing or opinion research or telephone 24        solicitation; and25            (ii) the monitoring is used with the consent of at 26        least one person who is an active party to the   HB4000- 38 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        marketing or opinion research conversation or 2        telephone solicitation conversation being monitored.3        No communication or conversation or any part, portion, 4    or aspect of the communication or conversation made, 5    acquired, or obtained, directly or indirectly, under this 6    exemption (j), may be, directly or indirectly, furnished 7    to any law enforcement officer, agency, or official for 8    any purpose or used in any inquiry or investigation, or 9    used, directly or indirectly, in any administrative, 10    judicial, or other proceeding, or divulged to any third 11    party.12        When recording or listening authorized by this 13    subsection (j) on telephone lines used for marketing or 14    opinion research or telephone solicitation purposes 15    results in recording or listening to a conversation that 16    does not relate to marketing or opinion research or 17    telephone solicitation; the person recording or listening 18    shall, immediately upon determining that the conversation 19    does not relate to marketing or opinion research or 20    telephone solicitation, terminate the recording or 21    listening and destroy any such recording as soon as is 22    practicable.23        Business entities that use a telephone monitoring or 24    telephone recording system pursuant to this exemption (j) 25    shall provide current and prospective employees with 26    notice that the monitoring or recordings may occur during   HB4000- 39 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    the course of their employment. The notice shall include 2    prominent signage notification within the workplace.3        Business entities that use a telephone monitoring or 4    telephone recording system pursuant to this exemption (j) 5    shall provide their employees or agents with access to 6    personal-only telephone lines which may be pay telephones, 7    that are not subject to telephone monitoring or telephone 8    recording.9        For the purposes of this subsection (j), "telephone 10    solicitation" means a communication through the use of a 11    telephone by live operators:12            (i) soliciting the sale of goods or services;13            (ii) receiving orders for the sale of goods or 14        services;15            (iii) assisting in the use of goods or services; 16        or17            (iv) engaging in the solicitation, administration, 18        or collection of bank or retail credit accounts.19        For the purposes of this subsection (j), "marketing or 20    opinion research" means a marketing or opinion research 21    interview conducted by a live telephone interviewer 22    engaged by a corporation or other business entity whose 23    principal business is the design, conduct, and analysis of 24    polls and surveys measuring the opinions, attitudes, and 25    responses of respondents toward products and services, or 26    social or political issues, or both;  HB4000- 40 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        (k) Electronic recordings, including but not limited 2    to, a motion picture, videotape, digital, or other visual 3    or audio recording, made of a custodial interrogation of 4    an individual at a police station or other place of 5    detention by a law enforcement officer under Section 6    5-401.5 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 or Section 7    103-2.1 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963;8        (l) Recording the interview or statement of any person 9    when the person knows that the interview is being 10    conducted by a law enforcement officer or prosecutor and 11    the interview takes place at a police station that is 12    currently participating in the Custodial Interview Pilot 13    Program established under the Illinois Criminal Justice 14    Information Act;15        (m) An electronic recording, including but not limited 16    to, a motion picture, videotape, digital, or other visual 17    or audio recording, made of the interior of a school bus 18    while the school bus is being used in the transportation 19    of students to and from school and school-sponsored 20    activities, when the school board has adopted a policy 21    authorizing such recording, notice of such recording 22    policy is included in student handbooks and other 23    documents including the policies of the school, notice of 24    the policy regarding recording is provided to parents of 25    students, and notice of such recording is clearly posted 26    on the door of and inside the school bus.   HB4000- 41 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        Recordings made pursuant to this subsection (m) shall 2    be confidential records and may only be used by school 3    officials (or their designees) and law enforcement 4    personnel for investigations, school disciplinary actions 5    and hearings, proceedings under the Juvenile Court Act of 6    1987, and criminal prosecutions, related to incidents 7    occurring in or around the school bus; 8        (n) Recording or listening to an audio transmission 9    from a microphone placed by a person under the authority 10    of a law enforcement agency inside a bait car surveillance 11    vehicle while simultaneously capturing a photographic or 12    video image; 13        (o) The use of an eavesdropping camera or audio device 14    during an ongoing hostage or barricade situation by a law 15    enforcement officer or individual acting on behalf of a 16    law enforcement officer when the use of such device is 17    necessary to protect the safety of the general public, 18    hostages, or law enforcement officers or anyone acting on 19    their behalf; 20        (p) Recording or listening with the aid of any device 21    to incoming telephone calls of phone lines publicly listed 22    or advertised as the "CPS Violence Prevention Hotline", 23    but only where the notice of recording is given at the 24    beginning of each call as required by Section 34-21.8 of 25    the School Code. The recordings may be retained only by 26    the Chicago Police Department or other law enforcement   HB4000- 42 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    authorities, and shall not be otherwise retained or 2    disseminated; 3        (q)(1) With prior request to and written or verbal 4    approval of the State's Attorney of the county in which 5    the conversation is anticipated to occur, recording or 6    listening with the aid of an eavesdropping device to a 7    conversation in which a law enforcement officer, or any 8    person acting at the direction of a law enforcement 9    officer, is a party to the conversation and has consented 10    to the conversation being intercepted or recorded in the 11    course of an investigation of a qualified offense. The 12    State's Attorney may grant this approval only after 13    determining that reasonable cause exists to believe that 14    inculpatory conversations concerning a qualified offense 15    will occur with a specified individual or individuals 16    within a designated period of time.17        (2) Request for approval. To invoke the exception 18    contained in this subsection (q), a law enforcement 19    officer shall make a request for approval to the 20    appropriate State's Attorney. The request may be written 21    or verbal; however, a written memorialization of the 22    request must be made by the State's Attorney. This request 23    for approval shall include whatever information is deemed 24    necessary by the State's Attorney but shall include, at a 25    minimum, the following information about each specified 26    individual whom the law enforcement officer believes will   HB4000- 43 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    commit a qualified offense:2            (A) his or her full or partial name, nickname or 3        alias;4            (B) a physical description; or5            (C) failing either (A) or (B) of this paragraph 6        (2), any other supporting information known to the law 7        enforcement officer at the time of the request that 8        gives rise to reasonable cause to believe that the 9        specified individual will participate in an 10        inculpatory conversation concerning a qualified 11        offense.12        (3) Limitations on approval. Each written approval by 13    the State's Attorney under this subsection (q) shall be 14    limited to:15            (A) a recording or interception conducted by a 16        specified law enforcement officer or person acting at 17        the direction of a law enforcement officer;18            (B) recording or intercepting conversations with 19        the individuals specified in the request for approval, 20        provided that the verbal approval shall be deemed to 21        include the recording or intercepting of conversations 22        with other individuals, unknown to the law enforcement 23        officer at the time of the request for approval, who 24        are acting in conjunction with or as co-conspirators 25        with the individuals specified in the request for 26        approval in the commission of a qualified offense;  HB4000- 44 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1            (C) a reasonable period of time but in no event 2        longer than 24 consecutive hours;3            (D) the written request for approval, if 4        applicable, or the written memorialization must be 5        filed, along with the written approval, with the 6        circuit clerk of the jurisdiction on the next business 7        day following the expiration of the authorized period 8        of time, and shall be subject to review by the Chief 9        Judge or his or her designee as deemed appropriate by 10        the court.11        (3.5) The written memorialization of the request for 12    approval and the written approval by the State's Attorney 13    may be in any format, including via facsimile, email, or 14    otherwise, so long as it is capable of being filed with the 15    circuit clerk. 16        (3.10) Beginning March 1, 2015, each State's Attorney 17    shall annually submit a report to the General Assembly 18    disclosing:19            (A) the number of requests for each qualified 20        offense for approval under this subsection; and21            (B) the number of approvals for each qualified 22        offense given by the State's Attorney. 23        (4) Admissibility of evidence. No part of the contents 24    of any wire, electronic, or oral communication that has 25    been recorded or intercepted as a result of this exception 26    may be received in evidence in any trial, hearing, or   HB4000- 45 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    other proceeding in or before any court, grand jury, 2    department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative 3    committee, or other authority of this State, or a 4    political subdivision of the State, other than in a 5    prosecution of:6            (A) the qualified offense for which approval was 7        given to record or intercept a conversation under this 8        subsection (q);9            (B) a forcible felony committed directly in the 10        course of the investigation of the qualified offense 11        for which approval was given to record or intercept a 12        conversation under this subsection (q); or13            (C) any other forcible felony committed while the 14        recording or interception was approved in accordance 15        with this subsection (q), but for this specific 16        category of prosecutions, only if the law enforcement 17        officer or person acting at the direction of a law 18        enforcement officer who has consented to the 19        conversation being intercepted or recorded suffers 20        great bodily injury or is killed during the commission 21        of the charged forcible felony.22        (5) Compliance with the provisions of this subsection 23    is a prerequisite to the admissibility in evidence of any 24    part of the contents of any wire, electronic or oral 25    communication that has been intercepted as a result of 26    this exception, but nothing in this subsection shall be   HB4000- 46 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    deemed to prevent a court from otherwise excluding the 2    evidence on any other ground recognized by State or 3    federal law, nor shall anything in this subsection be 4    deemed to prevent a court from independently reviewing the 5    admissibility of the evidence for compliance with the 6    Fourth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution or with Article 7    I, Section 6 of the Illinois Constitution.8        (6) Use of recordings or intercepts unrelated to 9    qualified offenses. Whenever any private conversation or 10    private electronic communication has been recorded or 11    intercepted as a result of this exception that is not 12    related to an offense for which the recording or intercept 13    is admissible under paragraph (4) of this subsection (q), 14    no part of the contents of the communication and evidence 15    derived from the communication may be received in evidence 16    in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before 17    any court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, 18    regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority 19    of this State, or a political subdivision of the State, 20    nor may it be publicly disclosed in any way.21        (6.5) The Illinois State Police shall adopt rules as 22    are necessary concerning the use of devices, retention of 23    recordings, and reports regarding their use under this 24    subsection (q). 25        (7) Definitions. For the purposes of this subsection 26    (q) only:  HB4000- 47 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1            "Forcible felony" includes and is limited to those 2        offenses contained in Section 2-8 of the Criminal Code 3        of 1961 as of the effective date of this amendatory Act 4        of the 97th General Assembly, and only as those 5        offenses have been defined by law or judicial 6        interpretation as of that date.7            "Qualified offense" means and is limited to:8                (A) a felony violation of the Cannabis Control 9            Act, the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 10            the Methamphetamine Control and Community 11            Protection Act, except for violations of:12                    (i) Section 4 of the Cannabis Control Act;13                    (ii) Section 402 of the Illinois 14                Controlled Substances Act; and15                    (iii) Section 60 of the Methamphetamine 16                Control and Community Protection Act; and17                (B) first degree murder, solicitation of 18            murder for hire, predatory criminal sexual assault 19            of a child, criminal sexual assault, aggravated 20            criminal sexual assault, aggravated arson, 21            kidnapping, aggravated kidnapping, child 22            abduction, trafficking in persons, involuntary 23            servitude, involuntary sexual servitude of a 24            minor, or gunrunning. 25            "State's Attorney" includes and is limited to the 26        State's Attorney or an assistant State's Attorney   HB4000- 48 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1        designated by the State's Attorney to provide verbal 2        approval to record or intercept conversations under 3        this subsection (q).4        (8) Sunset. This subsection (q) is inoperative on and 5    after January 1, 2027. No conversations intercepted 6    pursuant to this subsection (q), while operative, shall be 7    inadmissible in a court of law by virtue of the 8    inoperability of this subsection (q) on January 1, 2027. 9        (9) Recordings, records, and custody. Any private 10    conversation or private electronic communication 11    intercepted by a law enforcement officer or a person 12    acting at the direction of law enforcement shall, if 13    practicable, be recorded in such a way as will protect the 14    recording from editing or other alteration. Any and all 15    original recordings made under this subsection (q) shall 16    be inventoried without unnecessary delay pursuant to the 17    law enforcement agency's policies for inventorying 18    evidence. The original recordings shall not be destroyed 19    except upon an order of a court of competent jurisdiction; 20    and 21        (r) Electronic recordings, including but not limited 22    to, motion picture, videotape, digital, or other visual or 23    audio recording, made of a lineup under Section 107A-2 of 24    the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963; and . 25        (s) Recordings made pursuant to and in compliance with 26    the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera Act.   HB4000- 49 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 2102-918, eff. 5-27-22.) 3    (720 ILCS 5/31-4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 31-4)4    Sec. 31-4. Obstructing justice. 5    (a) A person obstructs justice when, with intent to 6prevent the apprehension or obstruct the prosecution or 7defense of any person, he or she knowingly commits any of the 8following acts:9        (1) destroys Destroys, alters, conceals or disguises 10    physical evidence, plants false evidence, furnishes false 11    information; or12        (2) induces Induces a witness having knowledge 13    material to the subject at issue to leave the State or 14    conceal himself or herself; or15        (3) possessing Possessing knowledge material to the 16    subject at issue, he or she leaves the State or conceals 17    himself; or18        (4) if If a parent, legal guardian, or caretaker of a 19    child under 13 years of age reports materially false 20    information to a law enforcement agency, medical examiner, 21    coroner, State's Attorney, or other governmental agency 22    during an investigation of the disappearance or death of a 23    child under circumstances described in subsection (a) or 24    (b) of Section 10-10 of this Code; or .25        (5) takes a body camera or any part of a body camera   HB4000- 50 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1    from a person known to be a peace officer. 2    (b) Sentence. 3        (1) Obstructing justice is a Class 4 felony, except as 4    provided in paragraphs paragraph (2) and (3) of this 5    subsection (b). 6        (2) Obstructing justice in furtherance of streetgang 7    related or gang-related activity, as defined in Section 10 8    of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention 9    Act, is a Class 3 felony.10        (3) A violation of paragraph (5) of subsection (a), if 11    the body camera or any part of the body camera is taken 12    from the peace officer during the commission of an offense 13    that has caused great bodily harm to the officer or 14    another person, is a Class 1 felony. Any other violation 15    of paragraph (5) of subsection (a) is a Class 2 felony. 16(Source: P.A. 97-1079, eff. 1-1-13.)  HB4000- 51 -LRB104 12419 RTM 22705 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 140/7.54    50 ILCS 706/10-105    50 ILCS 706/10-156    50 ILCS 706/10-207    50 ILCS 707/158    50 ILCS 707/209    720 ILCS 5/14-310    720 ILCS 5/31-4from Ch. 38, par. 31-4